New York, session 2025-2026, A7361.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 122-b of the general municipal law is amended by 2 adding three new subdivisions 6, 7 and 8 to read as follows: 3 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all 4 department of health licensed emergency departments which receive 5 patients via ambulance service shall be subject to the following fee 6 schedule payable to the ambulance service provider: 7 (a) No fee where upon ambulance arrival on the emergency department's 8 property, ambulance patients who are admitted and the ambulance service 9 released to service other emergency calls in under thirty minutes. 10 (b) Fee where every thirty minutes following the initial thirty minute 11 period whereby a patient is waiting to be admitted and the ambulance 12 service is providing services to the patient and/or is rendered unable 13 to respond to other emergency service calls, there shall be a fee 14 imposed utilizing upon the department's emergency services mobilization 15 rates prorated to thirty-minute increments. 16 7. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all 17 department of health licensed emergency departments which receive 18 patients via ambulance service shall be subject to the following fee 19 schedule payable to the department of health. All ambulance services 20 awaiting admittance of a patient in their care and rendered unable to 21 respond to other emergency service calls, the following fee schedule 22 shall apply: 23 (a) After one hour elapses, the fee imposed shall be one thousand 24 dollars. For each subsequent hour after the first hour, the fee imposed 25 will increase by five hundred dollars per hour. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11082-01-5 A. 7361 2 1 (b) The department of health shall review the fee schedule every four 2 years and determine increases based upon the consumer price index. 3 8. (a) Ambulance services who implement the fee schedule authorized by 4 subdivision six of this section shall bill the emergency department. 5 (b) Emergency departments shall render payment to the ambulance 6 provider within sixty days. Late payments shall be subject to a three 7 percent interest fee per month for each subsequent thirty day period. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.